Utah statutes.
78B-4-514.   Definitions -- Immunity for architects and engineers during
emergencies.
(1)  As used in this section:
(a)  "Architect" means a person licensed in accordance with Title 58, Chapter
3a, Architects Licensing Act.
(b)  "Declared state of emergency" means a state of emergency declared by the
governor of this state or by the chief executive officer of a political
subdivision, in accordance with Title 63A, Chapter 4, Disaster Response and
Recovery Act.
(c)  "Professional engineer" means a person licensed in accordance with Title
58, Chapter 22, Professional Engineers and Professional Land Surveyors
Licensing Act.
(d)  "Public official" means an appointed or elected federal, state, or local
official, including building inspectors and police and fire chiefs, acting
within the scope and jurisdiction of their authority during a declared
emergency.
(2)  An architect or professional engineer, acting in good faith and within
the scope of their respective licenses, is not liable for:
(a)  any acts, errors, or omissions; or
(b)  personal injury, wrongful death, property damage, or any other loss
arising from architectural or engineering services provided by the architect
or engineer:
(i)  as a non-paid volunteer at the request of a public official; and
(ii)  during, or for 90 days following, a declared state of emergency.
(3)  Nothing in Subsection (2) shall be construed to provide immunity to an
architect or engineer for architectural or engineering services that are not
within the scope of licensure.
